Massachusetts, session 194th, H909.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 21A of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the following section:
Section 29. (a) There shall be within the executive office of energy and environmental
affairs a grant and loan program to provide incentive funds to small businesses and
municipalities to transition landscape maintenance equipment to low noise, low emissions
equipment.
(b) To be eligible for a grant, small businesses and municipalities shall surrender gas-
powered landscape maintenance equipment for a one-for-one replacement with low-noise, low-
emissions equipment.
(c) Grant and loan funds awarded pursuant to subsection (a) may be used for:
(1) purchasing electric landscape maintenance equipment;
of 2

(2) training landscaping staff on the use and care of electric landscape maintenance
equipment;
(3) operational costs that may be accrued through the transition from gas-powered
landscape maintenance equipment to electric landscape maintenance equipment; and
(4) any other cost associated with the transition from gas-powered landscape maintenance
equipment to electric landscape maintenance equipment, as determined by the secretary.
(d) Loans awarded pursuant to subsection (a) shall carry 0 percent interest.
(e)(1) There is hereby established and set up on the books of the commonwealth a
separate fund to be known as the Low Noise, Low Emissions Landscape Maintenance
Equipment Trust Fund, in this section called the fund. The secretary shall be the trustee of the
fund and may expend amounts from the fund without further appropriation.
(2) Amounts credited to the fund shall not be subject to further appropriation and money
remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not revert to the General Fund and shall be
available for expenditure in the subsequent fiscal year.
(3) The secretary shall report annually, on or before August 1, to the house and senate
committees on ways and means and the senate and house chairs of the joint committee on
environment, natural resources, and agriculture regarding expenditure activity within the trust
fund.
of 2